Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Article 4. Actions To Foreclose Liens

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 29-1-401.
Jurisdiction of circuit and district court; Rules of Civil Procedure applicable in foreclosure action; attorney fees.

All actions to foreclose a lien perfected under this act are quasi in rem proceedings and shall be commenced by filing a complaint in either the district court or, when required under W.S. 5-9-128(a)(vi), in the circuit court, in any county in which the property subject to the lien is located.

In any action to foreclose a lien the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure shall govern.

In the event an action is filed to foreclose a lien pursuant to this act, the prevailing party shall be entitled to recover from the nonprevailing party all costs and expenses reasonably associated with the action, including but not limited to reasonable attorney fees.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a lien claimant to enforce his lien under this article if another method of enforcement is available under this act.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.

§ 29-1-402.
Priority of liens.

Except as provided in this section, the liens provided by this act shall be on an equal footing without reference to the date of the filing of the lien statement.

Any lien perfected in compliance with this act attaches to the real property, fixtures, materials, machinery or supplies furnished and improvements made in preference to any subsequent lien, security interest or mortgage under any other provision of law which has been perfected upon real or personal property, including a leasehold interest, against which the lien is claimed.

Any lien, security interest or mortgage which has been perfected upon real or personal property or upon a leasehold interest prior to the commencement of any construction work or repair of the premises or property, except as provided by chapter 7 of this act, or W.S.

29-8-102

relating to liens for the production of farm products under contracts executed, entered into, renewed or substantively amended on or after July 1, 2001, shall have priority.

Where a sale is ordered by the court on foreclosure of any lien provided by this act and the proceeds from the sale are insufficient to discharge in full all of the liens, the proceeds shall be prorated among the several lien claimants according to the amounts of their respective claims.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

The repealed section, which derived from Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 1, related to priority of liens.

Repeal effective July 1, 2011. —

Pursuant to Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, this section is repealed effective July 1, 2011.

Priority of subcontractor's lien relates back to commencement of construction on project. —

Cessation of construction does not preclude such a relation back. Thatcher & Sons v. Norwest Bank Casper, 750 P.2d 1324,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Bowles v. Sunrise Home Ctr., Inc., 847 P.2d 1002,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1993);
Keith L. Dobson & Aspen Constr. Co. v. Portrait Homes, Inc., 2005 WY 95, 117 P.3d 1200,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(2005).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Attorney's charging lien as including services rendered or disbursements made in other than instant action or proceeding, 23 ALR4th 336.

Priority between attorney's lien for fees against a judgment and lien of creditor against same judgment, 34 ALR4th 665.

Priority between attorney's charging lien against judgment and opposing party's right of setoff against same judgment, 27 ALR5th 764.

§ 29-1-403.
Work or materials furnished considered done under same contract; exceptions.

All work performed or materials furnished by a lien claimant shall be considered as having been done under the same contract unless more than one hundred eighty (180) days elapse from the date of the performance of any work or the furnishing of any materials and the date when work or materials are next performed or furnished by the lien claimant.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.

§ 29-1-404.
Notice of foreclosure to prior perfected lienholders; effect of failure to notify.

The holder of any prior perfected lien upon the real property is entitled to notice in suits to foreclose the lien. A foreclosure proceeding shall not be rendered invalid by failure to give the notice required by this section.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.

§ 29-1-405.
Remedies not exclusive.

The remedies provided by this act are not exclusive.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.

§ 29-1-406.
Filing and recording fees.

The county clerk shall be paid the same fees as provided by W.S.

18-3-402

for recording all papers under this act.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.

§ 29-1-407.
Consent to jurisdiction and venue.

By contracting to perform work or furnish materials on a project located in Wyoming, each contractor, subcontractor and materialman who asserts a lien submits to the laws of Wyoming and the jurisdiction of the district and circuit courts in the county in which the project is situated with respect to all lien claims, regardless of whether the lien claimant is a resident of Wyoming and regardless of whether the contract contains a contrary choice of law or venue provision. Venue for any mediation or arbitration of lien claims shall be proper only in the county in which the project is located, unless the parties agree otherwise.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.